Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska13-3312
Board; subject to Open Meetings Act and public records provisions.

(1) The board shall cause minutes of meetings and a record to be kept of all its proceedings. Meetings of the board shall be subject to the Open Meetings Act.

(2) An inland port authority's records and documents, except those which may be lawfully excluded, shall be considered public records for purposes of sections 84-712 to 84-712.09.

Laws 2021, LB156, § 12.

Open Meetings Act, see section 84-1407.